Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 3 Jurisdiction and Venue of Offenses

12-3-1.
Offenses triable by district court.

The district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of all crimes which are not expressly designated as felonies, offenses, misdemeanors, and violations, including offenses against town or city ordinances, if no special court exists or is created by charter or law for that purpose, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both, and of all other criminal matters which are or shall be declared specially to be within the jurisdiction of the court by the laws of the state, which shall legally be brought before the court, with power to try, render judgment, pass sentence, and award a warrant for execution of the sentence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 150; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14; P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1.

12-3-2.
Power of district court over preliminary proceedings — Venue of offenses on public waters.

The district court for the division in which the court is situated shall have cognizance over all other crimes, offenses, and misdemeanors against the laws of the state other than those mentioned in §

12-3-1

, which shall be done or committed within the division and legally brought before the court, and may cause all persons guilty or suspected to be guilty to be apprehended, examined, bailed, or committed to jail, according to law, to answer for the offense before the superior court, and the jurisdiction over crimes, offenses and misdemeanors committed on the public waters of the state, and within the jurisdiction or cognizance of the district court, may be exercised by the district court for any division adjoining the waters.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 151; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14.

12-3-3.
Jurisdiction of New Shoreham wardens’ court.

The wardens’ court of the town of New Shoreham shall have exclusive jurisdiction and cognizance over all crimes, offenses, and misdemeanors committed or done or occurring within the town of New Shoreham and the adjacent waters within the jurisdiction of the state, punishable by fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months, and of all other criminal matters within the town limits, which are or shall be declared specially to be within the jurisdiction of a district or wardens’ court by the laws of the state, which shall legally be brought before such wardens’ court, with power to proceed to trial, render judgment, pass sentence, and award a warrant for execution of the sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 712, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-3

; P.L. 2012, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 74, § 1.

12-3-4.
Venue of offenses.

Every indictment or information for offenses committed on the waters of Narragansett Bay may be tried in any county in the discretion of the attorney general, unless otherwise ordered by the presiding justice.

For the purpose of prosecuting and punishing criminal offenses over which the superior court has jurisdiction, the state of Rhode Island is declared to be a single district. The offenses shall be prosecuted and punished at the following locations unless otherwise ordered by the presiding justice:

For offenses committed in a city or town within Providence or Bristol counties, at the superior court in Providence;

For offenses committed in the city of Warwick or a town within Kent county, at the superior court in Warwick;

For offenses committed in a town within Washington county, at the superior court in South Kingstown; and

For offenses committed in the city of Newport or a town within Newport county, at the superior court in Newport.

For the purpose of prosecuting and punishing criminal offenses over which the district court has jurisdiction, the offenses shall be prosecuted and punished at the following locations unless otherwise ordered to be moved within the same county by the chief judge pursuant to this section or unless otherwise agreed to by the parties and the court: (1) for the offenses committed in a town within the first division, at the district court located within Bristol county; (2) for offenses committed in the city of Newport or a town within the second division, at the district court located within Newport county; (3) for offenses committed in the cities of Warwick or Cranston or a town within the third division, at the district court within the third division; (4) for offenses committed in a town within the fourth division, at the district court located within Washington county; (5) for offenses committed in a city or town within the fifth division, at the district court located within the fifth division; and (6) for offenses committed in a city within the sixth division, at the district court in Providence. The chief judge may order any criminal case or proceeding to be transferred to another division of the court within the same county. For purposes of this section, the first division shall be considered to be a part of Providence county.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 8; G.L., ch. 354, § 32; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-4

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 10; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 240, § 2.

12-3-5.
Offenses in vicinity of county or division boundary — Offenses at sea — Offenses aboard steamboat or train.

A criminal offense committed on or within one hundred (100) rods of the boundary line of two (2) counties may be alleged to have been committed and may be prosecuted and proceeded against in either county unless otherwise ordered by the presiding justice, and if committed on or within fifty (50) rods of the boundary line of two (2) divisions of the district court, it may be alleged to have been committed and may be proceeded against and prosecuted in either division unless otherwise ordered by the chief judge pursuant to §

12-3-4(c)

. A criminal offense committed upon the sea within one league of the shore may be prosecuted and punished in any county. A criminal offense committed upon a steamboat or a railroad car may be alleged to have been so committed without specifying the division of the district court or county in which it was committed, and may be prosecuted and proceeded against in any county or in any division.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 34; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1.

12-3-6.
Act within state resulting in death outside state.

If a mortal wound is given, or if other violence or injury is inflicted, or if poison is administered, within this state, as a result of which death ensues outside this state, the homicide shall be prosecuted and punished at the location of the superior court as the presiding justice may by order designate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 35; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-6

; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1.

12-3-7.
Jurisdiction based on importation of stolen property.

Whenever the property of another which has been taken or obtained in any other state or area within the jurisdiction of the United States, by the commission of any of the offenses described in §§

11-8-6

,

11-41-1

—

11-41-4

,

11-41-6

—

11-41-9

,

11-41-11

, and

11-44-7

, is brought into this state by the person who took or obtained the property by the commission of the offense, the offense by which the property was taken or obtained may be alleged to have been committed, and the person may be prosecuted and proceeded against in the superior court at any location that may by order be designated by the presiding justice or in any division of the district court in which the person is found in possession of the property, or through which the person may have transported the property or at any location that may be designated by the chief judge pursuant to §

12-3-4(c)

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 36; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1.

12-3-8.
Venue of larceny prosecutions.

Larceny, whether at common law, or as defined by §§

11-41-1

—

11-41-4

,

11-41-6

, and

11-41-11

, may be prosecuted and proceeded against in the superior court at any location that may by order be designated by the presiding justice or in any division of the district court in which the offense was committed, or in which the defendant has possession of the money or property which is alleged to have been stolen, or in which the false pretense was made or used or in any division that may be ordered by the chief judge pursuant to §

12-3-4(c)

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 33; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1.

12-3-9.
Possession of property stolen outside state.

Whenever any property has been taken or obtained in any other state or area within the jurisdiction of the United States by robbery, stealing, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or false pretenses with the intent to cheat and defraud, and the property is brought into this state by any person who knew it was so taken or obtained, that person shall be deemed guilty of the offense described in §

11-41-2

, and the offense may be alleged to have been committed in any county or in any division of the district court in which the person is found in possession of the property, or through which the person may have transported the property. The person may be prosecuted and proceeded against in the superior court at any location that may by order be designated by the presiding justice or in the division of the district court in which the offense is alleged to have been committed or in any division that may be ordered by the chief judge pursuant to §

12-3-4(c)

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 37; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

12-3-9

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 14; P.L. 1981, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 200, § 1.

12-3-10.
Enumeration of statutes of limitation.

The following compilation of statutes of limitation for criminal offenses is set forth as an aid to the public and is not intended to replace the specific statutes referred to in this section. The omission of any statute of limitation from this list shall in no way affect the validity of the statute.

Section Offense Period of Limitations

4-4-26

Offenses relating to diseased animals 30 days

11-13-2

Prosecution of illegal sale, use or possession of fireworks 30 days

11-47-53

Prosecution for firing weapons or carrying loaded weapons in vehicles 30 days

12-12-17

Minor criminal offenses; time for indictment or information 3 years

12-12-18

New indictment or information to replace one stolen, lost or destroyed 1 year

17-23-11

Prosecution of election law offenses 1 year

28-39-32

Temporary disability insurance act offenses 5 years

30-13-46(a)

Prosecution for desertion, AWOL during war, aiding the enemy or mutiny under the Rhode Island Code of Military Justice No limit

30-13-46(b)

Prosecution for desertion in peacetime or perjury under the Rhode Island Code of Military Justice 3 years

30-13-46(c)

Prosecution for summary court-martial offenses under the Rhode Island Code of Military Justice 2 years

31-23.2-8

To enforce liability for tampering with odometers 6 months

46-7-4

Proceedings for forfeitures for wrongfully making fast a vessel to a stake or buoy, or damaging same, in the Pawtucket River, Warren River or upper Narragansett Bay, or to markers or beacons in other areas 6 months

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 388, § 1.